Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-456.01
Pseudoephedrine
or phenylpropanolamine; limitation on acquisition; violation; penalty.

(1) No
person shall purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire, other than wholesale
acquisition by a retail business in the normal course of its trade or business,
any drug product containing more than three and six-tenths grams of pseudoephedrine
base or three and six-tenths grams of phenylpropanolamine base during a twenty-four-hour
period unless purchased pursuant to a medical order. Any person who violates
this section shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class
III misdemeanor for each subsequent offense.

(2) No person
shall purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire, other than wholesale acquisition
by a retail business in the normal course of its trade or business, any drug
product containing more than nine grams of pseudoephedrine base or nine grams
of phenylpropanolamine base during a thirty-day period unless purchased pursuant
to a medical order. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of
a Class IV misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class III misdemeanor for
each subsequent offense.

Laws 2005, LB 117, § 6;

Laws 2009, LB151, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB20, § 8.